District of Columbia statutes.
2-1903

Notice of need for interpreter.

(a)

A communication-impaired person entitled to an interpreter under this chapter shall, if practicable, notify the appropriate appointing authority of the person’s need for an interpreter at least 5 business days prior to the person’s appearance. A failure to notify the appointing authority of the need for an interpreter is not a waiver of the right to an interpreter.

(b)

An appointing authority, when it knows a communication-impaired person is, or will be coming before it, shall inform the communication-impaired person of the right to a qualified interpreter. In a judicial proceeding, when the court knows that a communication-impaired person will be before it, the court shall inform the party, or the parent of a juvenile who is a party, of the right of any communication-impaired person to a qualified interpreter.

History

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 4, 34 DCR 7426

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2703.